Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that engaging with high school students to prepare them for higher education and familiarize them with college admissions through guaranteed admissions increases equity, access, and credential completion in the state. The legislature intends to establish the Washington guaranteed admissions program as an appropriate and necessary step to accomplish these goals.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 28B.10 RCW to read as follows:(1) The Washington guaranteed admissions program is established in collaboration with the state's public four-year institutions of higher education specified in subsection (2) of this section.(2)(a) The regional universities, the state college, and at least one campus of each state university shall participate in the Washington guaranteed admissions program beginning in the 2027-28 academic year.(b) Institutions in (a) of this subsection may opt out of the Washington guaranteed admissions program by reporting to the legislature, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, the following:(i) The reason for opting out; and(ii) A detailed overview of other initiatives for improving admissions and expanding access to the institution for resident students.(3) Beginning with the 2027-28 academic year, participating institutions shall simplify and streamline the general admissions application form requiring only necessary information for students.(4) Beginning with the 2027-28 academic year, participating institutions shall determine, and annually review, eligibility criteria for the Washington guaranteed admissions program and shall notify the office of the superintendent of public instruction of the criteria to enable clear data sharing protocols. Participating institutions may coordinate through an organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 28A.150 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) Beginning with the 2027-28 school year, each school district, charter school, state-tribal education compact school, and institutional education provider with students in grade 11 or 12 who are members of the Washington school information processing cooperative shall use the statewide digital transcript data-sharing environment developed and maintained by the Washington school information processing cooperative to facilitate the secure, standards-compliant transfer of transcript data for students in grades 11 and 12 who meet the eligibility criteria established pursuant to section 2(4) of this act. The Washington school information processing cooperative must consider this a core function of membership and not charge additional fees for this use of the data-sharing environment or for the transfer of data.(b) By July 1, 2027, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall work with the Washington school information processing cooperative to develop a process to facilitate the transfer of data required under (a) of this subsection for school districts, charter schools, state-tribal education compact schools, and institutional education providers that are not members of the Washington school information processing cooperative without an additional cost and without requiring membership in the Washington school information processing cooperative.(c) Beginning with the 2028-29 school year, the Washington school information processing cooperative shall work with participating institutions to facilitate the transfer of data required under this subsection. Participating organizations may coordinate with an organization representing the presidents of the public four-year institutions of higher education to facilitate the transfer of data required under this subsection.(2) School districts, charter schools, state-tribal education compact schools, and institutional education providers must allow for a student or family to opt-out of the data sharing outlined in this section and must communicate that option with families.(3) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Charter school" means a school established under chapter 28A.710 RCW.(b) "Institutional education provider" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.190.005.(c) "Participating institutions" are those public baccalaureate institutions that have not opted out of the program.(d) "State-tribal education compact school" means a school subject to chapter 28A.715 RCW.--- END ---